Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Subarticle A. Right to Appraisal and Payment for Shares.

§79-4-13.01.
Definitions.

In this article:

“Affiliate” means a person that directly or indirectly through one or more intermediaries controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with another person or is a senior executive thereof.For purposes of Section 79-4-13.02(b)(5), a person is deemed to be an affiliate of its senior executives.

“Beneficial shareholder” means a person who is the beneficial owner of shares held in a voting trust or by a nominee on the beneficial owner’s behalf.

“Corporation” means the issuer of the shares held by a shareholder demanding appraisal and, for matters covered in Sections 79-4-13.22 through 79-4-13.31, includes the surviving entity in a merger.

“Fair value” means the value of the corporation’s shares determined:

“Interest” means interest from the effective date of the corporate action until the date of payment, at the rate of interest on judgments in this state on the effective date of the corporate action.

(5.1) “Interested transaction” means a corporate action described in Section 79-4-13.02(a), other than a merger pursuant to Section 79-4-11.05, involving an interested person in which any of the shares or assets of the corporation are being acquired or converted.As used in this definition:

“Preferred shares” means a class or series of shares whose holders have preference over any other class or series with respect to distributions.

“Record shareholder” means the person in whose name shares are registered in the records of the corporation or the beneficial owner of shares to the extent of the rights granted by a nominee certificate on file with the corporation.

“Senior executive” means the chief executive officer, chief operating officer, chief financial officer, and anyone in charge of a principal business unit or function.

“Shareholder” means both a record shareholder and a beneficial shareholder.

Immediately before the effectuation of the corporate action to which the shareholder objects;

Using customary and current valuation concepts and techniques generally employed for similar businesses in the context of the transaction requiring appraisal; and

Without discounting for lack of marketability or minority status except, if appropriate, for amendments to the articles pursuant to Section 79-4-13.02(a)(5).

“Interested person” means a person, or an affiliate of a person, who at any time during the one-year period immediately preceding approval by the board of directors of the corporate action:(A) was the beneficial owner of twenty percent (20%) or more of the voting power of the corporation, excluding any shares acquired pursuant to an offer for all shares having voting power if the offer was made within one (1) year prior to the corporate action for consideration of the same kind and of a value equal to or less than that paid in connection with the corporate action; (B) had the power, contractually or otherwise to cause the appointment or election of twenty-five percent (25%) or more of the directors to the board of directors of the corporation; or (C) was a senior executive or director of the corporation or a senior executive of any affiliate thereof, and that senior executive or director will receive, as a result of the corporate action, a financial benefit not generally available to other shareholders as such, other than:(1) employment, consulting, retirement, or similarbenefits established separately and not as part of, or in contemplation of, the corporate action; or (2) employment, consulting, retirement, or similar benefits established in contemplation of or as part of the corporate action that are not more favorable than those existing before the corporate action or, if more favorable, that have been approved on behalf of the corporation in the same manner as is provided in Section 79-4-8.62; or (3) in the case of a director of the corporation who will, in the corporate action become a director of the acquiring entity in the corporate action, or one of its affiliates, rights and benefits as a director that are provided on the same basis as those afforded by the acquiring entity generally to other directors of such entity or such affiliate.

“Beneficial owner” means any person who, directly or indirectly, through any contract, arrangement, or understanding, other than a revocable proxy, has or shares the power to vote, or to direct the voting of, shares; except that a member of a national securities exchange is not deemed to be a beneficial owner of securities held directly or indirectly by it on behalf of another person solely because the member is the record holder of the securities if the member is precluded by the rules of the exchange from voting without instruction on contested matters or matters that may affect substantially the rights or privileges of the holders of the securities to be voted.When two (2) or more persons agree to act together for the purpose of voting their shares of the corporation, each member of the group formed thereby is deemed to have acquired beneficial ownership, as of the date of the agreement, of all voting shares of the corporation beneficially owned by any member of the group.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 13.01; Laws, 1988, ch. 369, § 5; Laws, 2000, ch. 469, § 28; Laws, 2002, ch. 333, § 1; Laws, 2007, ch. 361, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 2007.

The 2000 amendment rewrote the section.

The 2002 amendment, substituted “79-4-13.02(b)(5)” for “79-4-13.02(b)(4)” in (1).

The 2007 amendment added (5.1).

Interest on judgments and decrees, see § 75-17-7.

Requirement that plan of reorganization of stock savings bank to ownership by holding company contain dissenters’ rights as provided under §§ 79-4-13.01 et seq., see § 81-14-401.

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 682, 683 et seq.

Holmes, The revised Model Business Corporation Act and corporate law reform in Mississippi.
57 Miss. L. J. 271, August, 1987.

§79-4-13.02.
Right to appraisal.

A shareholder is entitled to appraisal rights, and to obtain payment of the fair value of that shareholder’s shares, in the event of any of the following corporate actions:

Consummation of a merger to which the corporation is a party (i) if shareholder approval is required for the merger by Section 79-4-11.04 and the shareholder is entitled to vote on the merger, except that appraisal rights shall not be available to any shareholder of the corporation with respect to shares of any class or series that remain outstanding after consummation of the merger, or (ii) if the corporation is a subsidiary and the merger is governed by Section 79-4-11.05;

Consummation of a share exchange to which the corporation is a party as the corporation whose shares will be acquired if the shareholder is entitled to vote on the exchange, except that appraisal rights shall not be available to any shareholder of the corporation with respect to any class or series of shares of the corporation that is not exchanged;

Consummation of a disposition of assets pursuant to Section 79-4-12.02 if the shareholder is entitled to vote on the disposition;

An amendment of the articles of incorporation with respect to a class or series of shares that reduces the number of shares of a class or series owned by the shareholder to a fraction of a share if the corporation has the obligation or right to repurchase the fractional share so created;

Any other amendment to the articles of incorporation, merger, share exchange or disposition of assets to the extent provided by the articles of incorporation, bylaws or a resolution of the board of directors;

Consummation of a domestication if the shareholder does not receive shares in the foreign corporation resulting from the domestication that have terms as favorable to the shareholder in all material respects, and represent at least the same percentage interest of the total voting rights of the outstanding shares of the corporation, as the shares held by the shareholder before the domestication; or

Consummation of a conversion of the corporation to a different form of entity under the Mississippi Entity Conversion and Domestication Act.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), the availability of appraisal rights under subsection (a)(1), (2), (3), (4) and (6) shall be limited in accordance with the following provisions:

Appraisal rights shall not be available to any shareholder of the constituent corporations in a corporate reorganization transaction otherwise covered by subsection (a)(1) or (2) if: (i) the shareholders of an existing corporation exchange shares of such corporation for shares of a newly formed corporation and receive, after the reorganization, the same proportionate share interest in the new corporation and the rights and interests of the shareholders in the newly formed corporation are substantially the same as those in the existing corporation prior to the transaction; (ii) the newly formed corporation has no significant assets other than the shares of the existing corporation; (iii) after the reorganization the newly formed corporation and its subsidiaries have substantially the same assets and liabilities, on a consolidated basis, as those of the existing corporation prior to the transaction; (iv) fractional shares are neither created nor eliminated as a result of the transaction; (v) the existing corporation and the newly formed corporation are the only constituent corporations to such reorganization; (vi) the existing corporation and the newly formed corporation are corporations of this state; (vii) the directors of the existing corporation become the directors of the newly formed corporation upon the effective time of the corporate reorganization; (viii) the existing corporation becomes a direct wholly owned subsidiary of the newly formed corporation; and (ix) the shareholders of the existing corporation do not recognize gain or loss for United States federal income tax purposes as determined by the board of directors of the existing corporation.

Appraisal rights shall not be available for the holders of shares of any class or series of shares which is:

Listed on the New York Stock Exchange or designated as a national market system security on an interdealer quotation system by the National Association of Securities Dealers, Inc.; or

Not so listed or designated, but has at least two thousand (2,000) shareholders and the outstanding shares of such class or series has a market value of at least Twenty Million Dollars ($20,000,000.00) (exclusive of the value of such shares held by its subsidiaries, senior executives, directors and beneficial shareholders owning more than ten percent (10%) of such shares).

The applicability of subsection (b)(2) shall be determined as of:

The record date fixed to determine the shareholders entitled to receive notice of, and to vote at, the meeting of shareholders to act upon the corporate action requiring appraisal rights; or

The day before the effective date of such corporate action if there is no meeting of shareholders.

Subsection (b)(2) shall not be applicable and appraisal rights shall be available pursuant to subsection (a) for the holders of any class or series of shares who are required by the terms of the corporate action requiring appraisal rights to accept for such shares anything other than cash or shares of any class or any series of shares of any corporation, or any other proprietary interest of any other entity, that satisfies the standards set forth in subsection (b)(2) at the time the corporate action becomes effective.

Subsection (b)(2) shall not be applicable and appraisal rights shall be available pursuant to subsection (a) for the holders of any class or series of shares where the corporate action is an interested transaction.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the articles of incorporation as originally filed or any amendment thereto may limit or eliminate appraisal rights for any class or series of preferred shares, but any such limitation or elimination contained in an amendment to the articles of incorporation that limits or eliminates appraisal rights for any of such shares that are outstanding immediately prior to the effective date of such amendment or that the corporation is or may be required to issue or sell thereafter pursuant to any conversion, exchange or to other right existing immediately before the effective date of such amendment shall not apply to any corporate action that becomes effective within one (1) year of that date if such action would otherwise afford appraisal rights.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 13.02; Laws, 1990, ch. 411, § 7; Laws, 2000, ch. 469, § 29; Laws, 2001, ch. 435, § 14; Laws, 2007, ch. 361, § 9; Laws, 2014, ch. 399, § 36, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2015.

Pursuant to Section 1-1-109, the Joint Legislative Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation corrected an error in a statutory reference in (b)(1) by substituting “subsection (a)(1) or (2)” for “Section 79-4-13.02(a)(1) or (2).” The Joint Committee ratified the correction at its August 1, 2013, meeting.

Laws of 1990, ch. 411, § 8, provides as follows:

“SECTION 8. The provisions of this act are severable. If any provision is invalid, or if its application to any person or circumstance is invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.”

Subsection (c) contained an error in a statutory reference. At the direction of the co-counsel for the Joint Legislative Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation, the error has been corrected by substituting “Notwithstanding any other provision of this section” for “Notwithstanding any other provision of Section 79-4-13.02.”

The 2000 amendment rewrote the section.

The 2001 amendment, in (b), inserted (1) and redesignated the remaining paragraphs in (b) accordingly, made punctuation changes in (b)(5)(ii)(A), substituted “paragraph (5)” for “paragraph (4)” in (b)(6), and substituted “(b)(2)” for “(b)(1)” throughout.

The 2007 amendment added “the corporate action is an interested transaction” to the end of (b)(5); deleted former (b)(5)(i) through (b)(6); and deleted former (d).

The 2014 amendment, effective January 1, 2015, deleted “or” following “fractional share so created” at the end of (a)(4) and “or the American Stock Exchange” following “New York Stock Exchange” at the beginning of (b)(2)(i); inserted (a)(6) and (a)(7); substituted a comma for “and” and inserted “and (6)” in (b); and made minor punctuation changes.

Rights of former holders of shares of corporation that is party to merger or share exchange, which shares are to be converted into other shares, obligations, securities or cash or property, see § 79-4-11.07.

Requirement that surviving foreign corporation of merger and acquiring foreign corporation of share exchange agree to give appraisal rights to shareholders of domestic corporations party to merger or share exchange, pursuant to Article 13, see § 79-4-11.07.

Legality of proposed or completed action described in this section maybe contested and action enjoined, set aside or rescinded after shareholder approval of the action under certain circumstances, see § 79-4-13.40.

Mississippi Control Share Act, see §§ 79-27-1 et seq.

The fair value of stock is a purely factual question, and it was within the province of the chancellor, as the trier of fact, to evaluate the evidence, resolve any conflict, and to ascertain the fair value of stock to be paid by a corporation to those shareholders who dissented to a merger. Cal-Maine Foods, Inc. v. Duvic, 264 So. 2d 383, 1972 Miss. LEXIS 1353 (Miss. 1972).

Under circumstances of instant case, trial court did not err in finding fair value of dissenting stockholders’ shares of bank to be $100 per share, notwithstanding dissenting stockholders’ contention that court resorted to wrong methodology when it computed both market value and investment value of shares. Hernando Bank v. Huff, 796 F.2d 803, 1986 U.S. App. LEXIS 28054 (5th Cir. Miss. 1986).

Statutory prohibition against consideration of appreciation or depreciation in anticipation of corporate merger does not exclude consideration of purchase offers made for comparable corporations; in case of offer for comparable company, relevance of purchase offer is not diminished due to consummation of sale; minority discount is proper in determining fair value of stock of dissenters; in determining fair value of stock, court considers market value, asset value, and investment or earnings value; costs and expenses of proceeding which are assessed against corporation where dissenting shareholders were justified in not accepting offer do not include fees of counsel, although fees and expenses of experts may be allowed if court determines that fair value of shares as determined materially exceeds offer of corporation; interest on award accrues from date on which vote was taken on proposed corporate action, and court uses rate of return in effect for one-year certificate of deposit of that date. Hernando Bank v. Huff, 609 F. Supp. 1124, 1985 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 19880 (N.D. Miss. 1985), aff'd, 796 F.2d 803, 1986 U.S. App. LEXIS 28054 (5th Cir. Miss. 1986).

Dominant shareholder’s accountability to minority for profit, bonus, or the like, received on sale of stock to outsiders. 38 A.L.R.3d 738.

Timeliness and sufficiency of dissenting stockholder’s notice of his objection to consolidation or merger and of his demand for payment for his shares. 40 A.L.R.3d 260.

Right of corporation to discharge employee who asserts rights as stockholder. 84 A.L.R.3d 1107.

Propriety of applying minority discount to value of shares purchased by corporation or its shareholders from minority shareholders. 13 A.L.R.5th 840.

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 683, 684.

7A Am. Jur. Pl & Pr Forms (Rev), Corporations, Forms 411 et seq.

18 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 612-627.

§79-4-13.03.
Assertion of appraisal rights by nominees and beneficial owners.

A record shareholder may assert appraisal rights as to fewer than all the shares registered in the record shareholder’s name but owned by a beneficial shareholder only if the record shareholder objects with respect to all shares of the class or series owned by the beneficial shareholder and notifies the corporation in writing of the name and address of each beneficial shareholder on whose behalf appraisal rights are being asserted. The rights of a record shareholder who asserts appraisal rights for only part of the shares held of record in the record shareholder’s name under this subsection shall be determined as if the shares as to which the record shareholder objects and the record shareholder’s other shares were registered in the names of different record shareholders.

A beneficial shareholder may assert appraisal rights as to shares of any class or series held on behalf of the shareholder only if such shareholder:

Submits to the corporation the record shareholder’s written consent to the assertion of such rights no later than the date referred to in Section 79-4-13.22(b)(2)(ii); and

Does so with respect to all shares of the class or series that are beneficially owned by the beneficial shareholder.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 13.03; Laws, 2000, ch. 469, § 30, eff from and after July 1, 2000.

The 2000 amendment rewrote the section.

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 683, 684.